Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 60, article 1, section 3, subdivision 6, as amended by Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 1, article 1, section 17, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Fish and Wildlife Management 105,625,000 96,963,000 Appropriations by Fund 2024 2025 General 18,143,000 9,888,000 Natural Resources 2,082,000 2,082,000 Game and Fish 85,400,000 84,993,000 (a) $11,158,000 the first year and $11,158,000 the second year are from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund only for activities specified under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, paragraph (h), clause (1). Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, five percent of this appropriation may be used for expanding hunter and angler recruitment and retention. (b) $982,000 the first year and $982,000 the second year are from the general fund and $1,675,000 the first year and $1,675,000 the second year are from the game and fish fund for statewide response and management of chronic wasting disease. The commissioner and the Board of Animal Health must each submit annual reports on chronic wasting disease activities funded in this biennium to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources and agriculture. The general fund base for this appropriation in fiscal year 2026 and beyond is $282,000. (c) $5,150,000 the first year and $3,250,000 the second year are for inspections, investigations, and enforcement activities taken for the white-tailed deer farm program and for statewide response and management of chronic wasting disease. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. (d) $8,546,000 the first year and $8,546,000 the second year are from the deer management account for the purposes identified in Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.075, subdivision 1. (e) $268,000 the first year and $268,000 the second year are for increased capacity for broadband utility licensing for state lands and public waters. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. (f) $4,500,000 the first year is for enhancing prairies and grasslands and restoring wetlands on state-owned wildlife management areas to sequester more carbon and enhance climate resiliency. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (g) $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are from the general fund and $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund for grants for natural-resource-based education and recreation programs serving youth under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.976, and for grant administration. Priority must be given to projects benefiting underserved communities. The base for this appropriation in fiscal year 2026 and beyond is $500,000 from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund. The general fund appropriation is onetime. (h) $2,300,000 the first year is for a grant to the Fond du Lac Band of Lake Superior Chippewa to expand Minnesota's wild elk population and range. Consideration must be given to moving elk from existing herds in northwest Minnesota to the area of the Fond du Lac State Forest and the Fond du Lac Reservation in Carlton and southern St. Louis Counties. The Fond du Lac Band of Lake Superior Chippewa's elk reintroduction efforts must undergo thorough planning with the Department of Natural Resources to develop necessary capture and handling protocols, including protocols related to cervid disease management, and to produce postrelease state and Tribal elk comanagement plans. Of this amount, $300,000 is for the department for the purposes of this paragraph. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2029new text end . (i) $767,000 the first year is from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund to examine the effects of neonicotinoid exposure on the reproduction and survival of Minnesota's game species, including deer and prairie chicken. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (j) $134,000 the first year and $134,000 the second year are from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund for native fish conservation and classification. (k) $82,000 the first year is for the native fish reports required under this act. This is a onetime appropriation. (l) $65,000 the first year is for preparing the report on feral pigs and mink required under this act and holding at least one public meeting on the topic. (m) Up to $5,750,000 the first year and up to $2,225,000 the second year are available for transfer from the critical habitat private sector matching account to the reinvest in Minnesota fund for wildlife management areas acquisition, restoration, and enhancement according to Minnesota Statutes, section 84.943, subdivision 5b. (n) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, $300,000 the first year and $300,000 the second year are from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund for shooting sports facility grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 87A.10, including grants for archery facilities. Grants must be matched with a nonstate match, which may include in-kind contributions. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. (o) $75,000 the first year is from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund for enhanced fish stocking of white bass and crappies in lakes in the metropolitan area that have pier and shore fishing opportunities where communities are currently underserved. (p) $1,633,000 the first year is for a grant to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for chronic wasting disease contingency plans developed by the Center for Infectious Disease Research and Policy. This is a onetime appropriation. (q) $900,000 the first year is to create new or expand existing outreach and education programs for non-native English-speaking communities. Of this amount, $250,000 is for the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency and $250,000 is for the Board of Water and Soil Resources for this purpose. Up to $400,000 may be used to expand the Fishing in the Neighborhood program for outreach to new and underserved audiences. This appropriation may be used for community outreach consultants for reaching new audiences. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end